West Virginia, session 2025, SB415.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-5-2 of this code, modified by the Division of Natural Resources to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 3, 2024, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (public use of campgrounds in West Virginia State Parks and State Forests and campsites in State Rail Trails under the Division of Natural Resources, 58 CSR 32), is authorized.